Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Chapter 41. Special Improvements

§ 21-41-1.
Special improvements authorized.

Any municipality of this state may, by its governing authorities, cause the local improvements designated in Section 21-41-3 to be made, wholly or in part, at the cost of the property owners benefited thereby, by levying and collecting special assessments as provided in this chapter, and may finance such local improvements in the manner provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2558; 1942, § 3664-01; Laws, 1924, ch. 194; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, § 1; Laws, 1952, ch. 378.

§ 21-41-3.
Kind of improvements authorized.

The following local improvements may be constructed hereunder, to wit:

Streets, highways, boulevards, avenues, squares, lanes, alleys and parks, or any part thereof may be opened, reopened, widened, graded, regraded, paved, repaved, surfaced, resurfaced, and curbs and gutters may be constructed or reconstructed therein.

Sidewalks may be graded, regraded and leveled, laid, relaid, paved, repaved, surfaced or resurfaced.

Water mains, water connections, sanitary disposal systems, sanitary sewers, storm covers, and other surface drains or drainage systems may be laid, relaid, and constructed or reconstructed.

A project for which a certificate of public convenience and necessity has been obtained by the municipality pursuant to the Regional Economic Development Act.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2559; 1942, § 3664-02; Laws, 1924, ch. 194; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, § 2; Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved Aug. 30, 2000.).

§ 21-41-5.
Resolution; notice of meeting to consider objections.

When the governing authorities of any municipality shall determine to make any local or special improvement, the cost of which or any part thereof is to be assessed against the property benefited, they shall adopt a resolution declaring necessary the proposed improvement describing the nature and extent of the work, the general character of the material to be used, and the location and terminal points of the streets, highways, boulevards, avenues, squares, alleys or parks, or parts thereof, or clearly define the boundary of areas in which said improvements are to be made. In publishing said resolution declaring the work necessary, the plans and specifications of said work need not be published but may be referred to as being on file in the office of the city clerk or city engineer. The publication of the resolution may be made as provided in Section 21-17-19. Said resolution shall fix a date when the governing authorities of said municipality shall meet, which shall be not less than fifteen (15) days after the date of the first publication of the notice herein provided for, to hear any objections or remonstrances that may be made to said improvements. The notice herein provided for shall be published once each week for three (3) successive publications in a public newspaper having a general circulation in the municipality, and if no newspaper is published therein it shall be sufficient to post said notice in three (3) public places of the municipality for not less than fifteen (15) days before said meeting, one which shall be posted at the town or city hall of said municipality. Moreover, the clerk of the municipality shall send a copy of the notice, by certified mail, postage prepaid, within five (5) days after the first publication of the notice herein provided for, to the last-known address of owners of property affected by the resolution. However, failure of the clerk to mail such notice or failure of the owner to receive such notice shall not invalidate any proceeding in this chapter, where such notice has been published as provided herein. Notice declaring the work necessary shall be notice to the property owners that the work has been declared necessary.

If the governing authorities of a municipality desire to make any special or local improvement under the Regional Economic Development Act, the governing authorities also shall comply with any requirements provided therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2560; 1942, § 3664-03; Laws, 1924, ch. 194; Laws, 1936, ch. 284; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, § 3; Laws, 1958, ch. 522; Laws, 1988, ch. 457, § 9; Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved Aug. 30, 2000.).

§ 21-41-7.
Meeting to consider objections to proposed improvement.

At said meeting provided for by Section 21-41-5, or at a time and place to which same may be adjourned, any person aggrieved may appear in person, by attorney or by petition, and may object to or protest against said improvement or any part thereof. The governing authorities shall consider the objections and protests, if any, and may confirm, amend, modify or rescind the resolution of necessity, and shall determine whether said improvement shall be made and how the cost thereof shall be paid. The determination of such governing authorities shall be final and conclusive. However, if a majority of property owners owning more than fifty per cent of the front footage of the property involved and actually residing on property owned by them and included within that part of any street, avenue, or the like, ordered to be specially improved, or otherwise actually occupying property owned by them and included within that area shall file a protest, then the improvement shall not be made.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2561; 1942, § 3664-04; Laws, 1924, ch. 194; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-41-9.
Whole or part of cost of improvement may be charged against property benefited.

The resolution determining to proceed with the said improvement may direct that the cost and expense of the improvements authorized, or such part as the governing authorities shall fix, shall be a charge upon the property benefited. In said resolution the governing authorities shall direct that the whole or such part of the cost and expense thereof, as they shall fix, shall be assessed against the property abutting upon the improvement, according to the frontage thereof, in the following manner: by taking the number of front feet improved and dividing the total cost of the whole improvement thereby and multiplying the quotient by the number of front feet contained in such abutting lot or pieces of ground; the result shall be assessed by the governing authorities as the amount of the special tax to be assessed against each lot or piece of ground, except that the entire cost of improvements as to sidewalks, curbs, and gutters shall be assessed against the property on which said improvements or any of them abut for its entire frontage only.

In the case of water mains, water connections, sanitary sewers or sanitary disposal systems, the said resolution shall provide that the entire cost thereof, or so much of the same as the governing authorities of the municipality shall fix, shall be assessed against either the property benefited or the property on which each such improvement is located, without regard to the front footage of such improvement.

Alternatively, in the case of sanitary sewers and sanitary disposal systems, the said resolution may define the entire area to be benefited by the improvement, and may direct that the cost to be assessed against each lot or parcel of land shall be determined by dividing the entire cost thereof by the total number of front feet fronting on all the streets embraced within said improvement area, and multiplying the quotient by the number of feet of street frontage in any particular lot or parcel of land. The result thereof shall be assessed by the governing authorities as the amount of special tax against each lot or piece of ground for the owner’s part of the cost of the entire improvement.

In the case of storm sewers and surface drains or drainage systems, the said resolution shall clearly define the area to be benefited by the improvement contemplated, and shall determine that the cost of the improvement to be assessed against each lot or parcel of land within said area shall be determined by dividing the entire cost of the improvement by the total number of square feet in the area defined, and multiplying the quotient by the number of square feet contained in any particular lot or parcel of land within said area. The result thereof shall be assessed by the governing authorities as the amount of special tax against each lot or piece of ground as the owner’s part of the cost of the entire improvement. However, if a majority of the property owners owning more than fifty percent (50%) of the property involved and determined to be benefited by the contemplated improvement shall file a protest, then such improvement shall not be made.

If there be a steam, electric or other railroad track, or tracks, on any street, highway, or other public thoroughfare improved, paved, or repaved, under the provision of this chapter, the cost of such improvement between the tracks, and the rails of the tracks, and in case there be two (2) or more tracks, the space between such tracks and eighteen (18) inches on each side thereof, including switches and turnouts, shall be paid by the owner of the railroad and shall be assessed to and form a lien on said railroad and all the property connected therewith including power plant, wire, poles, and the like, if said railroad be operated by electricity. In the event storm or other sewers are constructed under the provisions of this chapter, which drain the streets or other public thoroughfares and rights-of-way, in which a steam, electric or other railroad has been constructed, there shall be assessed against such railroad a fair and just proportion of the cost of the construction of such sewer, to be determined by the governing authorities of such municipality, and such assessment shall be a lien upon the said railroad. However, nothing herein contained shall affect the right or power of the governing authorities of the municipality to require the owner of such railroad to repair or reconstruct its tracks or the pavement between the same and on either side thereof under any franchise granted to such owner or its predecessors in title, or under any contract made with such owner or its predecessors in title.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, §§ 2562, 2563; 1942, §§ 3664-05, 3664-06; Laws, 1924, ch. 194; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, §§ 5, 6; Laws, 1984, ch. 377, eff from and after July 1, 1984 (became law without Governor’s signature April 16, 1984).

§ 21-41-11.
What is to be deemed part of cost.

The governing authorities of such municipality shall have power to pay out of their general fund, or out of any special fund that may be provided for that purpose, such portion of the cost of the proposed improvement as they may deem proper. Interest accrued while an improvement is under construction, and for six (6) months thereafter, together with interest on interim financing authorized by Section 21-41-45 allocable on a pro rata basis to each such improvement, shall be deemed part of the cost thereof. Actual engineering and inspection costs, properly chargeable to any improvement, shall be deemed a part of the cost of the improvement. All costs for the issuance of the bonds hereinafter provided for shall be deemed part of the cost of the improvement.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2563; 1942, § 3664-06; Laws, 1924, ch. 194; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, § 6; Laws, 1987, ch. 414, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 21-41-13.
Assessment roll; assessment book; notice of meeting to consider objections.

Upon the completion of any improvement authorized by this chapter, the governing authorities shall ascertain and determine the cost of the improvement and declare the same by resolution. Upon said completion the governing authorities shall cause to be prepared a roll or list to be called the “assessment roll” showing the names of the property owners, and, opposite each name a description of each parcel of land. Such roll shall be entered in a well-bound book prepared for that purpose, which shall contain appropriate columns in which payments may be credited. Said book shall be known as “assessment book for local improvements.” It shall be a public record and the entry therein of any assessment shall be and constitute notice to the public of the lien against the land so assessed, and no other record or notice thereof shall be necessary to any person or corporation for that purpose. No error, omission or mistake in regard to the name of the owner shall be held to invalidate any assessment. After the completion of the said assessment roll it shall be delivered to the clerk of the municipality, or to the officer performing the duties of such clerk, who shall thereupon give a notice by publication in some newspaper published in said municipality that the assessment roll (for that piece of local improvement made) has been delivered to him and is open for inspection at his office, and that at a time and place therein mentioned, not less than fifteen days from the date of the first publication, the governing authorities of said municipality will meet to hear and determine any objections or defense.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2563; 1942, § 3664-06; Laws, 1924, ch. 194; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-41-15.
Determination of final assessments.

Assessments shall be made and apportioned in the manner fixed by the resolution of the governing authorities determining to proceed with the improvement. The owner of any property assessed for an improvement, or any party having an interest therein, may appear at the time and place fixed for the hearing and determining of any objections or defense, and object to the proposed assessment against the property or to the amount thereof. The governing authorities of the municipality shall hear and determine all objections and protests to the proposed assessment, under such reasonable rules and regulations as they may adopt. At such meeting, or at any adjournment thereof, the governing authorities may alter, change or correct any assessment; however, no assessment shall be increased without notice to the owner of the property. The governing authorities shall, by resolution, approve and confirm all assessments as finally fixed and adjusted at the said hearing, and said assessments shall, from the date of such confirmation, constitute a lien upon the respective lots or parcels of lands and other real property upon which they are levied, superior to all other liens except those for state and county taxes. All persons who fail to object to the proposed assessments, in the manner herein provided shall be deemed to have consented to and approved the same. Any property owner aggrieved by the decision of the governing authorities may appeal to the circuit court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2563; 1942, § 3664-06; Laws, 1924, ch. 194; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-41-17.
Method of payment of assessments.

All special assessments levied under the provisions of this chapter, unless otherwise provided by the governing authorities, shall become due and shall be paid to the treasurer of the municipality, (or to the officer performing the duties of such treasurer) in full within ninety (90) days from the date of confirmation thereof. However, the governing authorities of the municipality may by resolution confer upon the property owners who admit the legality of the assessment the privilege of paying the assessment in not exceeding twenty (20) equal installments with interest from the date of the confirmation at the same rate as that fixed in the bonds issued to raise money to pay the cost of the said improvements, which is to be paid in whole or in part by the owners of property abutting to the proposed improvements. Any property owner who shall not have taken an appeal from the assessment, shall, upon failure to pay said assessment in full within ninety (90) days from the date of confirmation, be deemed to have elected to pay said assessment in installments as herein provided, and he shall be deemed to have admitted the legality of the assessment and shall thereby waive all right to contest the validity thereof. The installments of said assessment shall be due and payable at the same time that the annual municipal tax becomes due and payable commencing with the first municipal tax levy, which is payable after the expiration of ninety days from the date of confirmation of the assessment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2564; 1942, § 3664-07; Laws, 1924, ch. 194; Laws, 1929, ch. 26; Laws, 1948, ch. 210; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, § 7; Laws, 1994, ch. 355, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 21-41-19.
Certification and collection of assessment; interest thereon.

The governing authorities shall annually certify to the tax collector, or other officer charged with the duty of collecting taxes in the municipality, the annual installment of assessment due from each tract of land against which an assessment has been levied, together with the amount of the interest upon all unpaid installments at the same rate as that fixed in the bonds issued to raise money to pay the cost of the said improvements, which is to be paid in whole or in part by the owners of property abutting to the proposed improvements. In the event no bonds are issued to raise money to pay the cost of the said improvements, which is to be paid in whole or in part by the owners of property abutting to the proposed improvements, then the said assessments shall bear a rate of interest not to exceed six per centum per annum, and shall be fixed by the governing authorities of the municipality making such improvements at the time when the said assessments are made final. In the event any municipality has made assessments for special improvements authorized by law and there are special improvement bonds outstanding which are paid by special assessments levied against property abutting the streets so improved, the governing authorities of such municipality shall change the interest on such assessments to equal the rate of interest fixed in such bonds and such change shall become effective on the date the governing authorities take such action and shall not be retroactive. Any property owner who has elected to pay his assessment in installments shall have the right at any time to pay the balance of the assessment against his property in full, but in so doing he shall be required to pay all interest which would have accrued thereon had same not been paid until its maturity.

The collector shall thereupon enter upon the annual tax roll of the municipality, in a separate column, the amount of the installment and interest to be collected from each tract of land assessed, and said collector shall collect said installment, together with the interest upon all unpaid installments, together with, and at the same time he collects the annual municipal tax.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2564; 1942, § 3664-07; Laws, 1924, ch. 194; Laws, 1929, ch. 26; Laws, 1948, ch. 210; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-41-21.
Noting of payments.

The treasurer shall immediately report to the clerk of the municipality, or to the officer performing the duties of such clerk, any assessment paid in full. The collector shall annually report to the clerk of the municipality, or to the officer performing the duties of such clerk, the installments paid in that year. The clerk of the municipality, or the officer performing the duties of such clerk, shall note such payments on the “assessment book for local improvements.” When an assessment is paid in full, or upon the payment of the last installment thereof, the clerk shall note on said “assessment book for local improvements” opposite the assessment, “paid in full.” Upon the payment of each installment an appropriate note thereof shall be made opposite such assessment on said book, so that the amount of the assessment against any property assessed under the provisions of this chapter, which remains a lien upon said property may be determined by reference to the “assessment book for local improvements.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2564; 1942, § 3664-07; Laws, 1924, ch. 194; Laws, 1929, ch. 26; Laws, 1948, ch. 210; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-41-23.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1994, ch. 355, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

[Codes, 1942, § 3664-15; Laws, 1931, ch. 19; Laws, 1934, ch. 322; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, § 15]

§ 21-41-25.
Assessments to be enforced and collected as are other taxes.

All assessments levied under the provisions of this chapter shall be enforced in the same manner in which the payment of other taxes in said municipality is enforced, and all statutes regulating the collection of other taxes in said municipality shall apply to the enforcement and collection of the assessments levied under the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2565; 1942, § 3664-08; Laws, 1924, ch. 194; Laws, 1929, ch. 26; Laws, 1934, ch. 246; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-41-27.
Delinquencies.

All assessments levied under the provisions of this chapter and the annual installments thereof shall become delinquent at the same time municipal ad valorem taxes become delinquent. Delinquent installments shall be collected in the same manner and at the same time delinquent ad valorem taxes are collected. Said delinquent installments shall bear the same penalties as those provided for delinquent taxes, and the penalties shall be upon the installment, or installments then delinquent. When any installment of the assessment shall become delinquent, if the property is sold for the non-payment of said delinquent installment, it shall be sold in the manner that property is sold for the non-payment of delinquent ad valorem taxes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, §§ 2564, 2565; 1942, §§ 3664-07, 3664-08; Laws, 1924, ch. 194; Laws, 1929, ch. 26; Laws, 1934, ch. 246; Laws, 1948, ch. 210; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, §§ 7, 8, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-41-29.
Redemption in whole.

The owner of property sold for delinquent assessments, or any other party interested in said property, shall have the right to redeem, upon the payment of the principal amount of the installment or installments then delinquent, and the penalties on such delinquent installment or installments as provided for delinquent taxes. Failure to redeem within two years shall vest the title in the purchaser at said sale, subject to the lien of any and all unmatured installments. Such redemption shall not discharge said property from the lien of unmatured assessments levied thereon, and said property shall remain subject to such lien as if no sale thereof had been made.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2565; 1942, § 3664-08; Laws, 1924, ch. 194; Laws, 1929, ch. 26; Laws, 1934, ch. 246; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-41-31.
Redemption in part.

If there exists upon a portion of a tract of land sold for delinquent assessments, a lien either of a deed of trust or mortgage of any kind, or if a portion of a tract of land sold for said delinquent assessments is owned by one who does not own the entire portion sold, then, subject to the provisions herein stated, the mortgagee or holder of the notes secured by such deed of trust, or the owner of such portion, or any person interested in such real estate, may redeem that portion of the land so sold in solido, upon which portion such mortgagee or owner of notes, or owner of less than the whole of the real estate is interested, in the following manner, to-wit:

Such mortgagee, or owner of notes secured by deed of trust, owner, or other person interested, may apply in writing to the municipal clerk within the time provided by law for redemption from sale of taxes to be permitted to redeem such portion of such entire tract so sold in solido in which he is interested. Upon the application being filed with him, it shall be the duty of the municipal clerk to give ten days’ notice in writing of such application by registered mail to the last known post office address, with return receipt requested, to the owner and to the purchaser at the tax sale, and to all persons holding mortgages or other liens of record on the land so sold in solido, or any part thereof, which notice shall designate a time not less than ten days from the mailing thereof when the governing authorities of the municipality shall hear and perform the duties hereinafter provided for. The clerk shall enter on the record of such tax sale notations giving the date when such notices were mailed, and the names and post office addresses of persons to whom mailed. On the date named for such hearing the governing authorities shall make such investigation as they may deem necessary to ascertain the relative value which that portion of land on which the lien of such mortgage or deed of trust is held by the applicant, or of which said applicant may be the owner, or otherwise interested, bears to the value of the entire land sold in solido for special assessment, and whether or not that portion not sought to be redeemed will remain adequate security for any assessment thereon. Should the governing authorities of the municipality determine from such investigation that that portion not sought to be redeemed will be adequate security and the interest of the municipality not adversely affected by permitting less than the whole to be redeemed, then they shall so adjudicate and fix and determine the amount of special improvement assessments which should be applied to each separate portion. The mortgagee or holder of the deed of trust, or owner, or any person interested in such real estate, shall thereupon be entitled to redeem that part of the land so sold by payment of the sum fixed thereon by such governing authorities, regardless of the amount of the purchaser’s bid at the tax sale, with its proportionate part calculated as above provided of all costs, damages and interest consequent upon the sale, and also all subsequent instalments which have accrued prior to the date of said redemption, together with all municipal ad valorem taxes that have accrued upon that portion of said land being redeemed, apportioned in the manner hereinabove provided, and together with interest thereon at the rate of one per centum per month, or any fractional part thereof, from the dates such installments and taxes shall have accrued. If the sale was made to an individual purchaser, the municipality shall upon such redemption, refund to the purchaser the proportionate amount because of said redemption, which shall in nowise affect the purchaser’s rights in so far as that portion which was not redeemed is concerned. Likewise, upon such redemption of less than the whole, in case of sale to the municipality, the municipality’s rights in so far as that portion not redeemed are concerned, shall not be in anywise affected.

The decision of the governing authorities as to the right to redeem less than the whole shall be final. Any aggrieved party shall have the right to appeal as in other cases.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3664-09; 3664-11; Laws, 1934, ch. 246; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, §§ 9, 11, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-41-33.
Change or division of assessment.

If, after the original assessment shall have been made, a portion of any lot or parcel of land which is assessed in solido, shall have changed ownership so that no one person is the owner of the entire lot or parcel of land so assessed in solido, then any such owner, or other party interested therein, may apply to the municipal authorities for a change or division of the assessment. Such application shall be in writing, filed with the municipal clerk, and the same notice and procedure shall be had thereon as is provided for the redemption of less than the whole when sold for delinquent installments. If the governing authorities are satisfied from their investigation that the land in each instance will be adequate security for the assessment placed thereon, and that the rights of the municipality will be in no wise injuriously affected, they may by appropriate order change or divide the assessments according to the ownership of the land so assessed.

The decision of the governing authorities as to the right to change or divide assessments shall be final. Any aggrieved party shall have the right to appeal as in other cases.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3664-10, 3664-11; Laws, 1934, ch. 246; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, §§ 10, 11, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-41-35.
Correction of imperfect assessments.

If any special assessment made pursuant to this chapter or attempted to be made in accordance with or by virtue of the authority conferred in any other law heretofore in force, to defray the whole or any part of the expense of any local improvement, shall be, either in whole or in part, annulled, vacated or set aside by the judgment of any court, or if the governing authorities of a municipality shall be satisfied that such assessment is so irregular or defective that the same cannot be enforced, or if the governing authorities shall have omitted to make such assessment when it might have done so, the governing authorities of the municipality are hereby authorized to take all steps to cause a new assessment for the whole or any part of any improvement, or against any property benefited by any improvement, following as near as may be the provisions of this chapter. In case such second assessment shall likewise be abrogated as above provided, the governing authorities may make other assessments, until a valid assessment shall be made.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3664-12; Laws, 1934, ch. 246; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-41-37.
Correction of errors or irregularities in estimate of cost.

If any municipality in this state, including those operating under a special charter, having the power to construct or cause to be made improvements consisting of grading, paving, graveling or any other form of improvement to its streets, avenues, alleys, sidewalks, gutters, sewerage or drainage, has levied or assessed or charged the cost thereof against the property abutting thereon and to the owners thereof, and has paid such cost and has not been paid therefor in full, and if in the judgment of the governing authorities of said municipalities, errors or irregularities have occurred in the assessing or computing of such cost, then such municipality is hereby authorized and empowered to ascertain the cost thereof and to add thereto accrued and unpaid interest, and to declare the same by resolution, and to correct errors or irregularities in said former assessment or assessments accordingly. In no event, however, shall the principal amount thereof, exclusive of interest, be increased.

When such errors or irregularities have been corrected, the assessment or assessments so made, and all steps and proceedings leading up thereto or precedent thereto are hereby confirmed and validated for all purposes and against all persons, and said assessment or assessments shall be in lieu of the assessment or assessments in which said errors or irregularities have been made or occurred. Such further proceedings may be had thereon to provide for and fix a lien on said property to secure the payment of said assessment or assessments, and for enforcing the collection thereof, and otherwise, in the same manner as is provided in this chapter, when valid assessments have been made that are not erroneous or irregular.

All orders, resolutions, ordinances, and proceedings relative to sidewalk, curb, or gutter improvements heretofore passed and adopted by any such municipality or its governing authorities, are hereby in all things made valid and binding regardless of defects or omissions or informalities or the failure to comply with any law or part of law relative thereto.

If and when it shall have been determined by said governing authorities that an over-assessment shall have been made against such person or property, such governing authorities are hereby authorized and empowered to give credit for or refund the amount of such excess.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3664-13; Laws, 1936, ch. 285; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-41-39.
Irregularity of proceeding shall not invalidate assessment.

No omission, informality or irregularity in the proceedings in, or preliminary to, the making of any special assessment shall affect the validity of the same, where the assessment roll has been confirmed by the governing authorities. The assessment roll and the record thereof kept by the city clerk shall be competent and sufficient evidence that the assessment was duly levied and the assessment rolls duly made and adopted, and that all other proceedings incident to the adoption of said assessment roll were duly had, taken and performed as required by this chapter. However, no assessment shall be valid and legal unless the notice required by this chapter shall have been given.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2567; 1942, § 3664-16; Laws, 1924, ch. 194; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-41-41.
Borrowing money to make improvements.

The governing authorities of every municipality in the state, which have heretofore or may hereafter declare their intention of authorizing any of the special improvements enumerated in Section 21-41-3, the cost of which is to be paid in whole or in part by the owners of property abutting to the proposed improvement, are authorized, in their discretion, to borrow money for said proposed improvement, including that portion of the cost thereof which is to be paid by the municipality and is not assessed against the property benefited, and to issue negotiable notes, certificates of indebtedness or special street improvement bonds therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2570; 1942, § 3664-19; Laws, 1924, ch. 194; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-41-43.
Maturation and interest of obligations; special improvement bond fund.

All obligations issued pursuant to Section 21-41-41 shall mature not longer than twenty (20) years from the date thereof, and shall be divided into approximately equal payments, with one (1) payment falling due each year. The obligations shall bear interest at a rate not exceeding that allowed in Section 75-17-101, payable annually or semiannually, and principal and interest on same shall be payable at such place within or without the state as may be designated by the issuing authorities at the time the obligations are issued. The full faith, credit and resources of the issuing municipality shall be pledged for the payment of the principal and interest on the obligations and the governing authorities of the municipality shall annually levy a tax on all taxable property in the municipality sufficient for such purposes, and where the obligations are issued for the purpose of making any of the special improvements set forth in this chapter, the cost of which is to be paid from assessments levied against the property abutting on the special improvement to be made under this chapter, the assessments shall also be pledged for the payment of the obligations. The funds derived from the taxes levied to pay the obligations shall be kept in a special fund to be known as the “Special Improvement Bond Fund,” and shall be used only for the purpose of paying principal and interest on the obligations. All funds derived from special assessments levied against the property abutting on the special improvements shall likewise be placed into the Special Improvement Bond Fund and shall be used only for the purpose of paying principal and interest on the obligations. Any surplus funds may be invested as provided by law, and may be used to pay the obligations at or before maturity.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2572; 1942, § 3664-20; Laws, 1924, ch. 194; Laws, 1950; ch. 495, § 20; Laws, 1975, ch. 431; Laws, 1976, ch. 409; Laws, 1980, ch. 523, § 5; Laws, 1981, ch. 462, § 5; Laws, 1982, ch. 434, § 10; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 15; Laws, 1995, ch. 354, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.